Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6221.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 34. (1) A Except as provided in subsection (9), a charter township existing on June 15, 1978, or a township incorporated after June 15, 1978 as a charter township that complies with the following standards, is exempt from annexation to any contiguous city or village except as provided in subsections (2) to (8): (a) Has a state equalized valuation of not less than $25,000,000.00. (b) Has a minimum population density of 150 persons per square mile to be determined by the secretary of state by dividing the most recent regular or special census of population by the number of square miles then under the jurisdiction of the charter township not to include the population or territory within the jurisdiction of an incorporated village. (c) Provides fire protection service by contract or otherwise. (d) Is governed by a comprehensive zoning ordinance or master plan. (e) Provides solid waste disposal services or recycling services to township residents, within or without the township, by contract, license, or municipal ownership. (f) Provides water or sewer services, or both, by contract or otherwise. (g) Provides police protection through contract with the sheriff in addition to normal sheriff patrol, through an intergovernmental contract, or through its own police department. (2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) and except as provided in subsection (9), the state boundary commission may, under procedures initiated and conducted under section 9 of the home rule city act, 1909 PA 279, MCL 117.9, order a portion or portions of a charter township to be annexed as necessary to eliminate free standing islands of the township completely surrounded by an annexing city, or to straighten or align the exterior boundaries of the city or village in a manner that the charter township and city or village contain uniform straight boundaries wherever possible. (3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) and except as provided in subsection (9), a portion of a charter township, which charter township is contiguous on all sides with a city or village, may be annexed by that city or village with the approval of a majority of the electors in that portion of a charter township. (4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) and except as provided in subsection (9), if a qualified elector does not reside in the territory proposed to be annexed that is contiguous to the city or village, other than the 1 or more persons petitioning, or if a petition signed by 1 or more persons, firms, corporations, the United States government, or the this state or any of its subdivisions that collectively hold the equitable title as vendee under a recorded land contract or memorandum of land contract, or recorded legal title to more than 1/2 of the area of the land in the territory to be annexed is filed with the city or village and with the township board of the charter township in which the territory is situated, the annexation may be accomplished by the affirmative majority vote of the city council or village board of the city or village and the approval of the charter township board of the township. (5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (3) and except as provided in subsection (9), a portion of a charter township contiguous to a city or village may be annexed to that city or village upon the filing of a petition with the county clerk which petition that is signed by 20% of the registered electors in the area to be annexed and approval by a majority of the qualified and registered electors voting on the question in the city or village to which the portion is to be annexed, and the portion of the township which is to be annexed, with the vote in each unit to be counted separately. (6) If a petition is filed as provided in subsection (5), the county clerk, after determining the validity of the petition, shall order a referendum on the question of annexation. This referendum shall must occur within not later than 1 year after the validation of the petitions. The referendum shall must be held at the first primary or general election held in that county not less than 60 days after the validation of the petition, or in compliance with the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.1 to 168.992. (7) A village having a population of 4,200 or more shall must not be annexed to a contiguous unit of government unless a majority of the qualified and registered electors residing within the village vote in favor of the annexation at an election held under the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.1 to 168.992. (8) The common boundary of a charter township and a city or village may be adjusted by resolution approved by a majority of each of the respective governing bodies after the governing bodies give 90 days' notice to property owners in the area proposed for the boundary adjustment, and the governing bodies conduct a public hearing on the proposed boundary adjustment. (9) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, a charter township with a population of more than 20,000 that meets all of the requirements under subsection (1)(a) to (g) is exempt from annexation and is not permitted to detach territory. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act applies to any annexation or detachment pending on or initiated after the effective date of this amendatory act.